Tennessee, session 114, SB2053.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 7, Chapter 51, is amended by adding
the following as a new part:
7-51-2801.
(a) Prior to any quarry or digital asset mining facility being located in a county,
including a county with a metropolitan form of government, or city, the appropriate local
legislative body must approve the location for such facility in a public meeting.
(b) There must be at least twenty-one (21) calendar days' notice of the time and
place of any meeting described in subsection (a). The notice must be published in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county, placed on the local legislative body's
official website, and posted in at least three (3) places at the location where the
proposed quarry or digital asset mining facility will be constructed. The local legislative
body shall also notify by first class mail each resident whose property is within five
hundred (500) yards of the proposed location.
(c) As used in this section:
(1) "Digital asset mining facility" means a group of computers working at
a single site that consume more than one (1) megawatt of energy on an average
annual basis for the purpose of securing a blockchain protocol and generating
controllable electronic records; and
SB2053
011319
- 1 -

(2) "Quarry" means the extraction, removal, and mechanized processing
of stone, gravel, phosphate rock, metallic ore, limestone, marble, chert, sand,
dimension stone, or any other solid mineral or substance of commercial value,
except coal and deep metal mining, including, but not limited to, zinc, found in
natural deposits in the earth, for barter or sale.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to any proposed quarry or digital asset mining facility that will be constructed on or after
that date.
- 2 - 011319